Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Licenses to Traffic in Alcoholic Beverages
243.540.
Scope of section — Disposition of stock upon revocation, surrender, court disposition, or nonrenewal of license — Disposition upon bankruptcy — Disposal of alcoholic beverages by secured creditor or landlord — Administrative regulations.

The provisions of this section shall apply to any licensee who is unable to continue in business at the licensed premises because of:

An act of God;

A casualty;

An acquisition by a federal, state, city, or other governmental agency under the power of eminent domain granted to the government or agency;

A voluntary or involuntary acquisition by any corporation or other business entity recognized by law through the power of eminent domain;

A loss of lease because the landlord fails to renew an existing lease;

Court action;

Default under a security agreement;

Default under a lease; or

Other verifiable business reason.

If a license issued by the department has been revoked, the former licensee may, under the supervision of the state administrator, dispose of and transfer the former licensee’s stock to another licensee if the disposition is completed within ninety (90) days and the licensee is a distiller, rectifier, winery, or brewer. The disposition shall be completed within thirty (30) days if the licensee is a wholesaler or distributor or within twenty (20) days if the licensee is a retailer.

A retail licensee in good standing with the department who voluntarily ceases to operate the licensed business for any reason other than revocation by the board or a court order shall dispose of all alcoholic beverage inventory within thirty (30) days of the event. The following requirements shall apply to the disposition of the licensee’s inventory:

If the premises is still open to the public and the licensee has not yet surrendered the license, the licensee shall sell alcoholic beverages only to the public and shall not sell below costs;

If a licensee has terminated the licensed business, the licensee shall submit a written request for approval from the state administrator within ten (10) days in advance of the sale to dispose of the licensee’s remaining inventory. The request shall identify the retailer who is purchasing the inventory, the proposed date of the sale, and the quantity, types, and brands of alcohol to be sold; and

If a licensee has more than one (1) licensed retail premises and closes one (1) or more retail premises and seeks to transfer the inventory to another licensed retail premises the licensee owns, the licensee shall submit a request in writing to the state administrator at least ten (10) days before the inventory is transferred. The request shall identify the premises to which the alcohol is being transferred, the proposed date of the transfer, and the quantity, types, and brands of alcohol to be sold.

If a licensee files for bankruptcy or is directed by a court to dispose of inventory to satisfy a lien or judgment, the inventory may be sold only to a licensee holding any license that authorizes the possession and sale of those alcoholic beverages. The bankrupt licensee or the licensee subject to the court order shall notify the department of the sale and shall attach a copy of the court order or the judgment directing the sale and a list of the quantity, types, and brands of alcohol to be sold, but if the licensee fails to do so, the notification may be made by the bankruptcy trustee, the lienholder, or the judgment creditor. Any licensee who purchases the inventory shall notify the department within five (5) days after the transfer of the specific inventory sold.

A secured creditor or landlord that is in possession, custody, or control of any alcoholic beverages owned by a licensee may dispose of those alcoholic beverages in the following manner:

The secured creditor or landlord shall submit a written request for approval from the state administrator, within twenty (20) days in advance of the sale or destruction of the licensee’s remaining inventory. The request shall identify the:

Licensee who is purchasing the inventory or the business to destroy the inventory;

Proposed date of the sale or destruction; and

Quantity, types, and brands of alcohol to be sold or destroyed;

The proposed transferee or transferees may be any person or persons holding any license that authorizes the possession and sale of those alcoholic beverages, or a business authorized to dispose of alcoholic beverages;

A copy of the written request shall be mailed by the department to the licensee’s registered agent or last known address on file with the department by certified mail. Within ten (10) days after the department’s mailing of this request, the licensee shall file with the department and applicant any objection the licensee has to the request, or be permanently barred from objecting; and

If a sale is approved, the licensee who purchases the inventory shall notify the department within five (5) days after the transfer of that specific inventory.

The board may promulgate administrative regulations for additional means for the transfer or disposal of alcoholic beverage inventory.

HISTORY:

2554b-144: amend. Acts 1998, ch. 522, § 14, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 435, § 14, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 581, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 77, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 78, effective June 29, 2017.

243.550.
Conduct of hearing by board.

Hearings upon appeals from orders of a local administrator, a license determination of a state administrator, or upon proceedings initiated by the department for license revocation or suspension shall be held by the board. The board may, at its discretion, hold the hearing in Frankfort, or in the county where the licensed premises, or the premises to be licensed, are located. Decisions shall be made and final orders entered only upon the vote of a majority of the board. The hearings shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

2554b-146: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 154, § 21; 1996, ch. 318, § 162, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 121, § 23, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 62, § 79, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

243.560.
Appeal to Circuit Court from order of board — How taken — Necessary parties — Final order, when effective — Power of court to dissolve stay.

All final orders of the board may be appealed to the Circuit Court of the county where the appellant resides or the county containing the appellant’s licensed premises, if any, notwithstanding KRS Chapter 13B.

A party to the administrative action may institute an appeal by filing a petition in the office of the clerk of the Circuit Court of the county where the appellant resides or the county containing the appellant’s licensed premises, if any, within thirty (30) days after the final order of the board is mailed or delivered by personal service.

The board, department, licensee or applicant, and any other parties to the administrative action shall be necessary parties to all appeals.

No final order of the board issuing a license shall become effective, and no license under that final order shall be issued, until the expiration of the appeal period contained in KRS Chapter 13B. If an appeal from a final order has been filed as provided under KRS

13B.140

, the final order shall not become effective until the appeal has been finally determined by the courts.
During the pendency of any appeal, a court may dissolve the stay under this section for good cause shown.

HISTORY:

2554b-147: amend. Acts 1996, ch. 318, § 163, effective July 15, 1996; 2017 ch. 62, § 80, effective June 29, 2017.

243.570.
Procedure on appeal. [Repealed.]

243.580.
Effective date of license after appeal — No injunction pending appeal. [Repealed.]

243.590.
Appeal to Court of Appeals.

Any party aggrieved by a judgment of the Circuit Court may appeal to the Court of Appeals in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure.

HISTORY:

2554b-147: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 58; 1960, ch. 104, § 15; 1976, ch. 62, § 109; 2017 ch. 62, § 81, effective June 29, 2017.

243.595.
Revocation or suspension of license by circuit court. [Repealed.]

243.600.
Issuance of county licenses.

The clerk of a county whose fiscal court has imposed license fees under KRS

243.060

shall immediately notify the board of the amount of the fees fixed. The county licenses shall be issued and the fees collected by the county clerk, who may charge a fee of fifty cents ($0.50) for his services for each license issued. The county clerk shall report and pay to the county treasurer at the end of each month such fees as he has collected. No license shall be issued without the approval of the county administrator, if there is one in the county. The licenses shall be issued in such form as may be prescribed by the county administrator, if there is one in the county, or by the board, if there is no county administrator.

If any part of this section is held invalid, all of this section and of KRS

243.060

shall also be considered invalid.

History.

2554b-112, 2554b-221.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A county cannot collect license fees from package store owners in a city of the first four classes for the authority for issuing such licenses rests exclusively with the city authorities to the absolute exclusion of the county authorities.

OAG 61-31

.

If the county judge, who is also the county administrator, leaves the county and state for an extended time and the circuit judge does not appoint an interim administrator, the ABC board would be authorized to go ahead and issue a county license.

OAG 65-471

.

243.610.
Issuance of city licenses.

The clerk of a city whose legislative body has imposed license fees under KRS

243.070

shall immediately notify the board of the amount of the fees fixed. The city licenses shall be issued and the fees collected by such municipal official as may be designated by ordinance. That official shall report and pay to the city treasurer at the end of each month such license fees as he has collected. No license shall be issued by the clerk without the approval of the city administrator, if there is one in the city. The licenses shall be issued in such form as may be prescribed by the city administrator, if there is one in the city, or by the board if there is no city administrator.

History.

2554b-113.

243.620.
Posting of licenses.

Before commencing or doing any business for the time for which a license has been issued, all licenses shall be posted and at all times displayed in a conspicuous place in the room or principal room where the business is carried on, so that all persons visiting the place may readily see the license.

No licensee shall post the license or permit it to be posted, upon premises other than the licensed premises or upon premises where traffic in alcoholic beverages is being carried on by any person other than the licensee, or knowingly deface, destroy, or alter the license in any respect.

HISTORY:

2554b-138, 2554b-205: amend. Acts 1998, ch. 121, § 24, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 62, § 82, effective June 29, 2017.

243.630.
Transfer of license or acquisition of interest without authorization prohibited.

For purpose of this section, “transfer” means:

The transfer to a new person or entity of ten percent (10%) or more ownership interest in any licensed business or license;

The transfer in bulk, and not in the ordinary course of business, of a major part of the fixtures, materials, supplies, merchandise, or other inventory of a licensee’s business; or

The transfer of a business or license to a different premises.

Any license issued to any person for any licensed premises shall not be transferable or assignable to any other person or to any other premises or to any other part of the building containing the licensed premises, unless a transfer or assignment is authorized by the state administrator in the exercise of sound discretion.

A licensee shall not acquire or otherwise dispose of any interest in a licensed premises or any license issued by the department, by sale of assets, stock, inventory, control or right of control, or activities on the licensed premises without prior approval of the state administrator. The state administrator shall treat a transfer applicant as a new applicant for qualification and discretion purposes.

Any acquisition of interest in a license without prior authorization shall be void.

All applications for approval of a transfer shall be made in writing to the state administrator having jurisdiction over the license.

Applications for approval of a transfer shall be made under oath or affirmation, shall be signed by both the transferor and the transferee, and shall contain any other information prescribed by the department.

The appropriate state administrator shall deny or approve the application when, in the sound discretion of the administrator, all of the necessary information has been obtained or the applicant has refused to provide requested information, but it shall not be acted upon before the end of the public protest period outlined in KRS

243.360

.

No licensee or other person seeking to acquire an interest in an existing license shall transfer control or assume control of any licensed premises by agreement or otherwise without the written consent of the state administrator of malt beverages or the state administrator of distilled spirits or both.

A licensee shall not transfer its license or any interest in the license while any proceedings against the license or the licensee for a violation of any statute or administrative regulation which may result in the suspension or revocation of the license are pending.

A licensee shall not transfer its license or any interest it has in the license if the licensee owes a debt on the inventory to a wholesaler responsible for the collection and payment of the tax imposed under KRS

243.884

.

A licensee shall not transfer its license or any interest in the license if the licensee owes the Commonwealth of Kentucky for taxes as defined in KRS 243.500(4). A transfer shall not take place until the department is notified by the Kentucky Department of Revenue that the licensee’s indebtedness has been paid or resolved to the satisfaction of the Department of Revenue. This section shall not prohibit a transfer of a license or an interest in a license by a trustee in bankruptcy if all other requirements of this section are met.

HISTORY:

2554b-160: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 188, § 198, effective July 15, 1980; 1998, ch. 522, § 15, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 20, § 10, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 655, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 582, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 62, § 83, effective June 29, 2017.

243.635.
“Transfer” defined — Transfer of license under specified circumstances prohibited. [Repealed.]

243.640.
Continuance in business by representative of defunct licensee.

If a corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, partnership, or other business entity recognized by law that holds a license is dissolved, or if a receiver, assignee for the benefit of creditors, or a guardian or conservator for the property of a licensee is appointed during the time for which a license was approved, or if a licensee dies during the time for which the license was issued and a personal representative is appointed for the licensee’s estate, that corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, partnership, other business entity recognized by law, receiver or assignee, or the personal representative of the estate of the deceased or individual adjudged to be mentally disabled, may be permitted to continue the business upon the licensed premises for the balance of the term for which the license was effective, and any renewed license approved by the state administrator, with the same rights and subject to the same restrictions and liabilities as if they had been the original licensee.

Before continuing the business the receiver, assignee, personal representative, or committee shall file a statement with the state administrator or administrators setting forth the facts and circumstances by which they have succeeded to the rights of the original licensee. The administrator or administrators may, in the exercise of the administrator’s sound discretion, permit or refuse to permit the continuance of the business.

If the administrator permits the continuance of the business, the license shall be submitted to the administrator, and the administrator shall write or stamp across the face of the license the words: “.... is permitted to exercise the rights and privileges of the original licensee as (assignee, receiver, personal representative, or committee, as the case may be) of the original licensee for the unexpired term of this license.” The endorsement on the face of the license shall be dated and signed by the person making it.

HISTORY:

2554b-148: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 77, effective July 1, 1982; 1998, ch. 121, § 25, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 62, § 84, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

243.650.
Transfer of license to other premises.

In case of destruction by an act of God or casualty for which the licensee was not responsible, of premises for which a license has been issued, the state administrator may, if in the administrator’s discretion the action is necessary to attain justice, change the license to authorize continuance of business at other premises. No transfer shall be made unless the licensee has filed a written verified statement of the reasons for the necessity of transfer. If the transfer is made the state administrator shall endorse a description of the new premises upon the license and shall date and sign the endorsement.

HISTORY:

2554b-149; 2017 ch. 62, § 85, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

243.660.
Pledging or granting of security interest in any licenses prohibited.

No person shall pledge or grant a security interest in any license. This type of pledge or security interest and any contract providing for the pledge or security interest shall be void.

HISTORY:

2554b-161; 2017 ch. 62, § 86, effective June 29, 2017.

243.670.
Applicant to pay for own license.

The license fee for every license shall be payable by the person who makes application for the license and to whom it is issued, and no other person shall pay for any license issued.

HISTORY:

2554b-163; 2017 ch. 62, § 87, effective June 29, 2017.

243.675.
Injunctive or other judicial proceedings by board — Priority of cases.

The board may compel obedience to its lawful orders by injunction or other proper proceedings in Franklin Circuit Court or any other court of competent jurisdiction, and the proceedings shall have priority over all pending cases.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 522, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.